Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3326
Legislative intent.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the formation of a private nonprofit corporation which meets the criteria of the federal Soybean Promotion, Research, and Consumer Information Act of 1990, 7 U.S.C. 6301 et seq., as a qualified state soybean board to continue Nebraska's soybean industry development program and to take over from the Soybean Development, Utilization, and Marketing Board the duties of the qualified state soybean board under the federal act.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that a smooth transition of Nebraska's soybean development program from the Soybean Development, Utilization, and Marketing Board to the private nonprofit corporation be made.

Laws 1995, LB 434, § 2.